South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4388.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 6, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-6-75. The department shall develop a voluntary standard revocable living will form that is offered for execution as part of the Medicaid application process. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----